Colorado statutes. TITLE 6 Consumer and Commercial Affairs
ARTICLE 18
HEALTH-CARE COVERAGE COOPERATIVES -
PROVIDER NETWORKS

Editor's note:

Parts 1, 2, and 4 of this article were relocated to part 10 of article 16 of title 10 in 2004.

Cross references:

For general provisions relating to health care insurance, see article 16 of title 10.

Law reviews:

For article, "H.B. 94-1193: Health

C

are Purchasing Reform", see 23

C

olo. Law. 2763 (1994).

Section

PART 1 GENERAL PROVISIONS

PART 2 HEALTH-CARE COVERAGE
COOPERATIVES

PART 3 PROVIDER NETWORKS

PART 4 TECHNICAL ASSISTANCE TO
AUTHORIZED COOPERATIVES FROM
DEPARTMENT OF HEALTH CARE POLICY
AND FINANCING